cs: Návrh fotbalové figuríny: Skládací rám; Propojená zeď; Nafukovací; Vyskakovací pružina; Pevný; Jiné
pt-PT: Design do manequim de futebol: Estrutura dobrável; Parede conectada; Insuflável; Mola pop-up; Rígida; Outro
da: Design af fodbolddummy: Sammenklappelig ramme; Sammenhængende mur; Oppustelig; Pop-op-fjeder; Stiv; Andet
fr: Type de construction du mannequin de football: Cadre pliable; Mur connecté; Gonflable; Ressort pop-up; Rigide; Autre
sk-SK: Dizajn futbalovej figuríny: Skladací rám; Spojená stena; Nafukovacia; Vyskakovacia pružina; Pevná; Iný
nl: Voetbaldummy ontwerp: Inklapbaar frame; Verbonden muur; Opblaasbaar; Pop-upveer; Stijf; Anders
th: การออกแบบหุ่นฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล: โครงพับได้; กำแพงเชื่อมต่อ; เป่าลม; ป๊อปอัพสปริง; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на футболен манекен: Сгъваема рамка; Свързана стена; Надуваем; Изскачаща пружина; Твърд; Друго
ko: 축구 더미 디자인: 접이식 프레임; 연결형 벽; 공기 주입식; 팝업 스프링; 고정형; 기타
pt-BR: Barreira de treino para futebol design: Estrutura dobrável; Barreira conectada; Inflável; Pop-up com mola; Rígida; Outro
it: Design del manichino da calcio: Struttura pieghevole; Barriera collegata; Gonfiabile; Pop-up a molla; Rigida; Altro
el: Σχεδίαση ομοιώματος ποδοσφαίρου: Πτυσσόμενος σκελετός; Συνδεδεμένο τείχος; Φουσκωτό; Ελατήριο pop-up; Άκαμπτο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Futbolo manekeno dizainas: Sulankstomas rėmas; Sujungta sienelė; Pripučiamas; Išskleidžiamas su spyruokle; Standus; Kita
ja: サッカー用ダミーのデザイン: 折りたたみ式フレーム; 連結ウォール; 空気注入式; ポップアップスプリング; 固定式; その他
hu: Focis edzőbábu kialakítása: Összecsukható váz; Összekapcsolt fal; Felfújható; Pop-up rugós; Merev; Egyéb
en: Soccer dummy design: Collapsible frame; Connected wall; Inflatable; Pop-up spring; Rigid; Other
pl: Konstrukcja manekina piłkarskiego: Składana rama; Połączona ściana (mur); Dmuchana; Sprężynowa (pop-up); Sztywna; Inny
zh-TW: 足球假人設計: 可折疊框架; 連接牆式; 充氣式; 彈簧彈出式; 硬式; 其他
ro-RO: Design al manechinului de fotbal: Cadru pliabil; Zid conectat; Gonflabil; Cu arc pop-up; Rigid; Altele
sl-SI: Zasnova nogometne žive stene: Zložljivo ogrodje; Povezana stena; Napihljivo; Samopostavljiva vzmet; Toga; Drugo
vi: Thiết kế hình nộm bóng đá: Khung gập gọn; Tường nối liền; Bơm hơi; Bật bung lò xo; Cứng; Khác
ru: Конструкция футбольного манекена: Складной каркас; Связанная стенка; Надувной; Раскладной на пружине; Жёсткий; Другое
es: Diseño del maniquí de fútbol: Estructura plegable; Pared conectada; Inflable; Resorte desplegable; Rígido; Otro
hr-HR: Dizajn lutke za nogomet: Sklopivi okvir; Povezani zid; Na napuhavanje; Pop-up s oprugom; Kruti; Ostalo
sv: Fotbollsdocka – design: Hopfällbar ram; Sammankopplad vägg; Uppblåsbar; Pop-up fjäder; Stel; Övrigt
de: Design der Fußball-Attrappe: Zusammenklappbarer Rahmen; Verbundene Wand; Aufblasbar; Pop-up-Feder; Starr; Andere
nb: Fotballdukkedesign: Sammenleggbar ramme; Sammenkoblet vegg; Oppblåsbar; Pop-up-fjær; Stiv; Annet
tr: Futbol kuklası tasarımı: Katlanabilir gövde; Bağlantılı duvar; Şişme; Açılır kapanır yaylı; Sert; Diğer
fi: Vapaapotkunuken malli: Kokoontaittuva runko; Yhdistetty seinä; Puhallettava; Pop-up-jousi; Jäykkä; Muu
zh-CN: 足球训练假人设计: 可折叠框架; 连排人墙; 充气式; 弹出式弹簧; 硬质; 其他